Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2153
Sections, how construed.

The powers conferred by sections 18-2147 to 18-2153 shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and shall be independent of and in addition to any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska with reference to the matters covered in such sections. The provisions of such sections and all grants of power, authority, rights, or discretion to a city or village and to an authority created under the Community Development Law shall be liberally construed, and all incidental powers necessary to carry into effect such sections are hereby expressly granted to and conferred upon a city or village or an authority created pursuant to the Community Development Law.

Laws 1979, LB 158, § 16;

Laws 1991, LB 15, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 774, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 35.